Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5102
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Insurers Investment Act is to protect and further the interests of policyholders, claimants, creditors, and the general public by establishing standards, requirements, and limitations for the investments of insurers doing business in this state. Such standards, requirements, and limitations are intended to promote solvency, investment yield and growth, investment diversification, investment value stability, and liquidity to meet business needs.

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 2.